test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_kiela_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# ok

Tests:

    
  Noun - kielâ:
    kielâ+N+Sg+Nom: kielâ
    kielâ+N+Sg+Gen: kielâ
    kielâ+N+Sg+Acc: kielâ
    kielâ+N+Sg+Ill: kielân
    kielâ+N+Sg+Loc: kielâst
    kielâ+N+Sg+Com: kieláin
    kielâ+N+Sg+Abe: kielâttáá
    kielâ+N+Ess: kiellân
    kielâ+N+Par: kiellâd
    kielâ+N+Pl+Nom: kielah
    kielâ+N+Pl+Gen: kielâi
    kielâ+N+Pl+Acc: kielâid
    kielâ+N+Pl+Ill: kieláid 
    kielâ+N+Pl+Loc: kielâin
    kielâ+N+Pl+Com: [kielâiguin, kielâigijn]
    kielâ+N+Pl+Abe: kielâittáá
    
    
  Noun - njuolâ:
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Nom: njuolâ
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Gen: njuolâ
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Acc: njuolâ
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Ill: njuolân
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Loc: njuolâst
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Com: njuoláin
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Abe: njuolâttáá
    njuolâ+N+Ess: njuollân
    njuolâ+N+Par: njuollâd
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Nom: njuolah
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Gen: njuolâi
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Acc: njuolâid
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Ill: njuoláid
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Loc: njuolâin
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Com: [njuolâiguin, njuolâigijn]
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Abe: njuolâittáá


  Noun - vuojâ:
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Nom: vuojâ
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Gen: vuojâ
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Acc: vuojâ
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Ill: vuojân
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Loc: vuojâst
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Com: vuojáin
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Abe: vuojâttáá
    vuojâ+N+Ess: vuoijân
    vuojâ+N+Par: vuoijâd
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Nom: vuojah
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Gen: vuojâi
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Acc: vuojâid
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Ill: vuojáid 
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Loc: vuojâin
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Com: [vuojâiguin, vuojâigijn]
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Abe: vuojâittáá


  Noun - suonâ:
    suonâ+N+Sg+Nom: suonâ
    suonâ+N+Sg+Gen: suonâ
    suonâ+N+Sg+Acc: suonâ
    suonâ+N+Sg+Ill: suonân
    suonâ+N+Sg+Loc: suonâst
    suonâ+N+Sg+Com: suonáin
    suonâ+N+Sg+Abe: suonâttáá
    suonâ+N+Ess: suonnân
    suonâ+N+Par: suonnâd
    suonâ+N+Pl+Nom: suonah
    suonâ+N+Pl+Gen: suonâi
    suonâ+N+Pl+Acc: suonâid
    suonâ+N+Pl+Ill: suonáid 
    suonâ+N+Pl+Loc: suonâin
    suonâ+N+Pl+Com: [suonâiguin, suonâigijn]
    suonâ+N+Pl+Abe: suonâittáá

  Noun - muorâ:
    muorâ+N+Sg+Nom: muorâ
    muorâ+N+Sg+Gen: muorâ
    muorâ+N+Sg+Acc: muorâ
    muorâ+N+Sg+Ill: muorân
    muorâ+N+Sg+Loc: muorâst
    muorâ+N+Sg+Com: muoráin
    muorâ+N+Sg+Abe: muorâttáá
    muorâ+N+Ess: muorrân
    muorâ+N+Par: muorrâd
    muorâ+N+Pl+Nom: muorah
    muorâ+N+Pl+Gen: muorâi
    muorâ+N+Pl+Acc: muorâid
    muorâ+N+Pl+Ill: muoráid 
    muorâ+N+Pl+Loc: muorâin
    muorâ+N+Pl+Com: [muorâiguin, muorâigijn]
    muorâ+N+Pl+Abe: muorâittáá
